apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="ї/сти__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>стим</l>      <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ж</l>         <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>сти</l>       <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>м</l>         <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>мо</l>        <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>си</l>        <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>сте</l>       <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>сть</l>       <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>дять</l>      <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="куп/увати__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>уватиму</l>   <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватимемо</l> <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватимеш</l>  <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватимете</l> <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватиме</l>   <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватимуть</l> <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ив<b/>би</l>  <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ила<b/>б</l>  <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ило<b/>б</l>  <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>или<b/>б</l>  <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уймо</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уй</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уйте</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>лено</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>увати</l>     <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ив</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ила</l>       <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ило</l>       <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>или</l>       <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>увавши</l>    <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>лен</l>       <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уюч</l>       <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уючи</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ую</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уємо</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уєш</l>       <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уєте</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ує</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ують</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="куп/увати__vblex_imperf">
  <e>       <p><l>уватиму</l>   <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватиме</l>   <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__пише_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уватимуть</l> <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уймо</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уй</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уйте</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>лено</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>увати</l>     <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>увавши</l>    <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>лений</l>     <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уючий</l>     <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>уючи</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ую</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ує</l>        <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__пише_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ують</l>      <r>увати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="купувати">        <i>куп</i><par n="куп/увати__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="їсти">            <i>ї</i><par n="ї/сти__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="будувати" c="check"><i>буд</i><par n="куп/увати__vblex_imperf"/></e>
<e lm="вирішувати" c="check"><i>виріш</i><par n="куп/увати__vblex_imperf"/></e>
<e lm="годувати" c="check"><i>год</i><par n="куп/увати__vblex_imperf"/></e>
<e lm="купувати">        <i>куп</i><par n="куп/увати__vblex_imperf"/></e>
